Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 2. Fishing for Oysters and Clams; Device Restrictions
§ 28.2-535.
Permit to buy or carry seed oysters from certain grounds; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to buy or carry oysters from the eastern side of the Counties of Accomack and Northampton or from the James River seed area, whose shells measure less than three inches in length without first obtaining a permit. A permit shall be required for each boat, vessel, or motor vehicle used to carry such cargo. The applicant shall obtain the permit from the officer assigned to the district where the cargo is loaded. The permit shall state the name and tonnage of the boat, vessel, motor vehicle, or other conveyance; the name of the owner and captain; the destination of the oysters; and the identity of the permit applicant. The cargo may be loaded under the supervision of the officer, in the order of the presentation of the permit to the officer in the district in which the boat, vessel, motor vehicle, or other conveyance is to obtain its cargo.

Any such permittee who takes seed oysters to a place not specified in his permit and does not notify the Commissioner within twenty-four hours of the change in planting location is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The owner or captain of any boat, vessel, motor vehicle, or other conveyance found buying or carrying seed oysters from these public grounds without a permit is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-111; 1954, c. 447; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-97; 1966, c. 642; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-536.
Taking clams in certain areas; penalty.

It is unlawful to take or catch clams in Pocomoke Sound above a line drawn from Drum Bay Point, in the County of Accomack, and running a north-northwest course to the line between the States of Maryland and Virginia, except upon such grounds in those waters as may be set aside by the Commission for public clamming.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-137; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-120; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 684; 1970, c. 726; 1979, c. 274; 1991, c. 285; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 28.2-537.
Restriction on size of clams; penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to harvest or ship clams smaller in size than the legal size established by the Commission.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 28-137; 1960, c. 517; 1962, c. 406, § 28.1-120; 1964, c. 393; 1966, c. 684; 1970, c. 726; 1979, c. 274; 1991, c. 285; 1992, c. 836.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.